Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB194.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Any provision of a covenant, condition or restriction
that restricts any real property owned by a state educational institution,
as defined in K.S.A. 76-711, and amendments thereto: (1) To be used
only for single-family residence purposes; or (2) from being used for
any purpose other than a single-family residence, and contains
discriminatory provisions to restrict ownership or tenancy by race is
hereby declared to be against public policy, and such provisions, and
any additional amendments, covenants or conditions related thereto,
shall be void and unenforceable.
(b) The provisions of this section shall only apply to any covenant,
condition or restriction, including any amendments or supplements
thereto, established between January 1, 1948, and December 31, 1958.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
_________________________
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
________________________
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.